Maryland, session 2025, SB0234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
SUBTITLE 14. HOMELESS SHELTER CERTIFICATION PROGRAM.
6–1401.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0234*

SENATE BILL 234
(B) “CENTRALIZED OR COORDINATED ASSESSMENT SYSTEM” MEANS A
CENTRALIZED OR COORDINATED PROCESS, OPERATED BY A CONTINUUM OF CARE,
DESIGNED TO COORDINATE PROGRAM PARTICIPANT INTAKE ASSESSMENT AND
PROVISION OF REFERRALS.
(C) “CERTIFICATION” MEANS A HOMELESS SHELTER CERTIFICATION
ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) “CONTINUUM OF CARE” MEANS A REGIONAL OR LOCAL PLANNING BODY
THAT COORDINATES HOUSING AND SERVICES FUNDING FOR HOMELESS FAMILIES
AND INDIVIDUALS.
(E) “GENDER IDENTITY” MEANS THE GENDER WITH WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL
IDENTIFIES, REGARDLESS OF THE GENDER ASSIGNED TO THAT INDIVIDUAL AT
BIRTH OR IDENTIFIED IN DOCUMENTS.
(F) “HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 24 U.S.C. §
11302.
(G) “HOMELESS MANAGEMENT INFORMATION SYSTEM” MEANS THE
INFORMATION SYSTEM DESIGNATED BY A CONTINUUM OF CARE TO COMPLY WITH
THE RELEVANT REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT.
(H) (1) “HOMELESS SHELTER” MEANS A FACILITY THAT IS OPERATED
FOR THE PRIMARY PURPOSE OF PROVIDING TEMPORARY OVERNIGHT SLEEPING
ACCOMMODATIONS, MEALS, BASIC NEEDS ASSISTANCE, AND SUPPORTIVE SERVICES
FOR CASE MANAGEMENT AND HOUSING NAVIGATION TO HOMELESS INDIVIDUALS.
(2) “HOMELESS SHELTER” INCLUDES FACILITIES THAT UTILIZE
HOTELS OR MOTELS FOR SLEEPING ACCOMMODATIONS.
(3) “HOMELESS SHELTER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A SHELTER CREATED OR AUTHORIZED BY A STATE OR
LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY TO RESPOND TO A DISASTER OR OTHER
LARGE–SCALE EMERGENCY SHELTER NEEDS; OR
(II) A FACILITY OR PROGRAM WHERE THE PARTICIPANT SIGNS
A LEASE OR LEGAL AGREEMENT FOR A RENTAL UNIT OR PAYS RENT FOR THE USE OF
THE FACILITY.

SENATE BILL 234 3
(I) “SEXUAL ORIENTATION” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL’S EMOTIONAL,
ROMANTIC, OR PHYSICAL ATTRACTION TO A PARTICULAR SEX OR GENDER.
(J) “SHELTER RESIDENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS COMPLETED
INTAKE PROCEDURES AND IS OR WILL BE RESIDING AT A HOMELESS SHELTER.
6–1402.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL OPERATE A CERTIFICATION PROGRAM FOR
HOMELESS SHELTERS.
(B) A BUILDING MAY NOT BE USED AS A HOMELESS SHELTER UNLESS THE
OWNER AND ANY OPERATOR HAVE BEEN CERTIFIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) AN OWNER AND ANY OPERATOR OF A HOMELESS SHELTER SHALL APPLY
TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A CERTIFICATION TO USE A BUILDING AS A HOMELESS
SHELTER ON A FORM THAT THE DEPARTMENT PROVIDES.
(D) ON REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT, A CERTIFICATION HOLDER SHALL
ALLOW THE DEPARTMENT IMMEDIATE ACCESS TO INSPECT THE PREMISES AND
INTERIOR OF A BUILDING USED AS A HOMELESS SHELTER, BOTH FOR ROUTINE
MONITORING AND UNSCHEDULED INSPECTIONS.
(E) CERTIFICATION HOLDERS ARE SUBJECT TO A RECERTIFICATION
PROCESS EVERY 2 YEARS, IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
6–1403.
AN APPLICATION FOR A CERTIFICATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A DEMONSTRATION OF ADHERENCE BY THE OWNER AND ANY
OPERATOR OF THE HOMELESS SHELTER TO THE OPERATIONAL AND BUILDING
STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 6–1404 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(2) ANY OTHER DOCUMENTATION OR INFORMATION REQUIRED BY
THE DEPARTMENT IN REGULATION.
6–1404.

SENATE BILL 234
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH BY REGULATION A TIERED
SYSTEM FOR HOMELESS SHELTER CERTIFICATIONS BASED ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS BEING SERVED BY THE SHELTER;
(2) THE TYPE AND DURATION OF SHELTER PROVIDED; AND
(3) THE TYPE AND INTENSITY OF SERVICES PROVIDED.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH
OPERATIONAL STANDARDS AND MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS FOR EACH HOMELESS
SHELTER CERTIFICATION CLASS THAT MAY INCLUDE:
(1) ORGANIZATIONAL, INCORPORATION, AND GOVERNANCE
DOCUMENTS;
(2) FISCAL, ADMINISTRATIVE, AND LEGAL DOCUMENTS;
(3) STAFFING REQUIREMENTS;
(4) PROCEDURES FOR SCREENING AND TRAINING STAFF AND
VOLUNTEERS;
(5) SHELTER RESIDENT INFORMATION COLLECTION AND TRACKING;
(6) ADMISSIONS, DISCHARGE, AND GRIEVANCE POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES;
(7) PROTECTION OF THE RIGHTS OF SHELTER RESIDENTS;
(8) PROTECTION OF SHELTER RESIDENT PRIVACY AND
CONFIDENTIALITY;
(9) PROTECTIONS AND SAFETY PROTOCOLS FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO
ARE SURVIVORS OF:
(I) DOMESTIC VIOLENCE;
(II) DATING VIOLENCE;
(III) SEXUAL ASSAULT; OR
(IV) STALKING;

SENATE BILL 234 5
(10) ACCESS TO SUPPORTIVE SERVICES;
(11) VISITATION BY GUESTS AND EXTERNAL SERVICE PROVIDERS;
(12) RULES AND REGULATIONS THAT RESIDENTS MUST COMPLY WITH;
(13) EMERGENCY PROCEDURES;
(14) HEALTH AND SAFETY POLICIES AND PROCEDURES;
(15) NONDISCRIMINATION POLICIES AND PROCEDURES;
(16) THE MINIMUM SQUARE FOOTAGE PER BED;
(17) ACCESS TO SECURE STORAGE;
(18) FIRE PREVENTION MEASURES;
(19) HEATING AND COOLING SYSTEMS;
(20) STRUCTURAL MATERIAL AND BUILDING REQUIREMENTS;
(21) ACCESSIBILITY FOR DISABLED INDIVIDUALS;
(22) SANITARY AND PERSONAL HYGIENE FACILITIES;
(23) WATER SUPPLY;
(24) ILLUMINATION AND ELECTRICITY SYSTEMS;
(25) FOOD PREPARATION FACILITIES AND AREAS;
(26) LEAD–BASED PAINT AND ASBESTOS;
(27) PROVISIONS FOR:
(I) PREGNANT INDIVIDUALS;
(II) NURSING INDIVIDUALS;
(III) INFANTS; AND

SENATE BILL 234
(IV) CHILDREN;
(28) COMPLIANCE WITH LOCAL BUILDING AND PROPERTY
MAINTENANCE CODES, WHERE APPLICABLE;
(29) COMPLIANCE WITH:
(I) THE FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT;
(II) THE FEDERAL FAIR HOUSING ACT; AND
(III) OTHER APPLICABLE FEDERAL LAWS; AND
(30) LIABILITY INSURANCE COVERAGE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH A SHELTER
RESIDENT BILL OF RIGHTS ESTABLISHING MINIMUM STANDARDS FOR THE
PROTECTION OF THE RIGHTS OF SHELTER RESIDENTS.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A GRIEVANCE
PROCESS FOR HOMELESS INDIVIDUALS AND SHELTER RESIDENTS TO NOTIFY THE
DEPARTMENT OF ALLEGED VIOLATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE OR REGULATIONS
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(1) DEVELOP TRAININGS AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR
HOMELESS SHELTERS ON OPERATIONAL STANDARDS DEVELOPED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(2) REQUIRE ORGANIZATIONS THAT OWN AND OPERATE HOMELESS
SHELTERS TO COMPLETE TRAININGS.
6–1405.
(A) AN OPERATOR OF A HOMELESS SHELTER SHALL PARTICIPATE IN THE
HOMELESS MANAGEMENT INFORMATION SYSTEM OPERATED BY THE LOCAL
CONTINUUM OF CARE.
(B) AN OPERATOR OF A HOMELESS SHELTER SHALL ENTER SHELTER
RESIDENT INTAKE AND EXIT ASSESSMENTS INTO THE HOMELESS MANAGEMENT
INFORMATION SYSTEM FOR EACH RESIDENT WHO CONSENTS TO SHARE THIS
INFORMATION.

SENATE BILL 234 7
(C) AN OPERATOR OF A HOMELESS SHELTER SHALL PARTICIPATE IN THE
CENTRALIZED OR COORDINATED ASSESSMENT SYSTEM OPERATED AND
ADMINISTERED BY THE LOCAL CONTINUUM OF CARE.
(D) AN OPERATOR OF A HOMELESS SHELTER MAY NOT DENY ADMISSION OR
SERVICES TO ANY HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL BECAUSE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S:
(1) RACE;
(2) COLOR;
(3) RELIGION;
(4) NATIONAL ORIGIN;
(5) SEX;
(6) DISABILITY STATUS;
(7) MARITAL STATUS;
(8) FAMILIAL STATUS;
(9) SEXUAL ORIENTATION;
(10) GENDER IDENTITY;
(11) AGE;
(12) CRIMINAL HISTORY, EXCEPT AN INDIVIDUAL CONVICTED OF A
SEXUAL OFFENSE;
(13) CURRENT OR PAST USE OF ALCOHOL OR ILLEGAL DRUGS, EXCEPT
AN INDIVIDUAL ASSESSED BY SHELTER STAFF AS A THREAT TO THE HEALTH,
SAFETY, OR PROPERTY OF OTHERS; OR
(14) LACK OF VALID IDENTIFICATION.
6–1406.
(A) FOR CAUSE, THE DEPARTMENT MAY DENY, SUSPEND, OR REVOKE A
HOMELESS SHELTER CERTIFICATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 234
(B) GROUNDS FOR DENIAL, SUSPENSION, OR REVOCATION INCLUDE:
(1) VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) VIOLATION OF A REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) MISREPRESENTATION TO THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(4) SUBMISSION OF A FALSE STATEMENT ON A CERTIFICATION
APPLICATION.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SET FORTH IN WRITING ITS REASONS FOR
DENIAL, SUSPENSION, OR REVOCATION.
(D) TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE GOVERNS
THE APPEAL OF A DENIAL, REVOCATION, OR SUSPENSION.
6–1407.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) HOMELESS SHELTERS SHALL HAVE NOT LESS THAN 12 MONTHS FROM
THE DATE REGULATIONS ARE ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO COMPLY WITH
THE REGULATIONS.
(C) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE, MAY ALLOW
EXTENSIONS OF THE DEADLINE FOR A HOMELESS SHELTER TO COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE OR REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE ON A CASE–BY–CASE BASIS:
(1) FOR GOOD CAUSE; AND
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT HAS RECEIVED EVIDENCE THAT THE
HOMELESS SHELTER IS ENGAGED IN A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN AND MAKING
ADEQUATE PROGRESS IN ADDRESSING NONCOMPLIANCE.
6–1408.
(A) IN ADDITION TO THE PENALTIES PROVIDED IN § 6–1406 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, A PERSON THAT OPERATES A HOMELESS SHELTER WITHOUT A
CERTIFICATION OR IN VIOLATION OF REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS

SENATE BILL 234 9
SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY NOT TO EXCEED $10,000
FOR EACH VIOLATION.
(B) IN SETTING THE AMOUNT OF AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER FACTORS INCLUDING THE NATURE,
NUMBER, AND SERIOUSNESS OF THE VIOLATIONS.
(C) IF AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY IS IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE AN ORDER THAT STATES:
(1) THE BASIS ON WHICH THE ORDER IS MADE;
(2) THE AMOUNT OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY IMPOSED; AND
(3) THE MANNER IN WHICH THE AMOUNT OF THE PENALTY WAS
CALCULATED.
(D) A PERSON SUBJECT TO AN ORDER IMPOSING AN ADMINISTRATIVE
PENALTY UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL HAVE THE RIGHT TO APPEAL THE ORDER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.